Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 5 GENERAL PROVISIONS
23-5-144. Students' right to speak in a public forum - legislative declaration - violations - court actions - free speech zones - definitions.

The first amendment of the United States constitution and article II, section 10 of the Colorado constitution each protect the right to free speech, including the speech of students enrolled at public institutions of higher education. The general assembly declares that it is a matter of statewide interest to protect the rights of students to exercise their freedom of speech on the campuses of public institutions of higher education, while recognizing the right of those institutions of higher education to enact reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions that preserve their ability to fulfill their educational missions. At the same time, the general assembly declares that student expression on the campuses of institutions of higher education is a vital component of the educational environment at these institutions of higher education and that promoting the free and unfettered exchange of ideas in this marketplace of ideas is one way in which these institutions of higher education fulfill their educational missions.

Therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly that the provisions of subsections (2) to (6) of this section be confined to and apply only to student expression in a student forum at an institution of higher education, as defined herein.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Expression" means any lawful verbal or written means by which individuals may communicate ideas to one another, including all forms of peaceful assembly, protests, speaking verbally, holding signs, circulating petitions, and distributing written materials. "Expression" includes voter registration activities but does not include speech that is primarily for a commercial purpose, including the promotion, sale, or distribution of any product or service.

"Institution of higher education" means a public postsecondary institution.

"Student" means a person who is enrolled for educational purposes at an institution of higher education.

"Student forum" means, as applied to students, any generally accessible, open, outdoor area on the campus of an institution of higher education, as well as any nonacademic and publicly open portion of a facility that the institution of higher education has traditionally made available to students for expressive purposes.

An institution of higher education shall not limit or restrict a student's expression in a student forum, including subjecting a student to disciplinary action resulting from his or her expression, because of the content or viewpoint of the expression or because of the reaction or opposition by listeners or observers to such expression.

Nothing in this section grants students, faculty, or staff of the college or university the right to materially disrupt previously scheduled or reserved activities in a portion or section of the student forum at that scheduled time.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as preventing an institution of higher education from prohibiting, limiting, or restricting expression that is not protected under the first amendment and article II, section 10 of the Colorado constitution.

An institution of higher education shall not designate any area on campus as a free speech zone or otherwise create policies implying that its students' expressive activities are restricted to particular areas of campus. An institution of higher education shall not, except for the purpose of enacting time, place, and manner restrictions permitted pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, restrict the right of students to engage in expression in a student forum.

An institution of higher education shall not impose restrictions on the time, place, and manner of student expression in a student forum unless the restrictions:

Are reasonable;

Are justified without reference to the content of the speech;

Are narrowly tailored to serve a significant governmental interest; and

Leave open ample alternative channels for communication of the information or message.

Any student who has been denied access to a student forum for expressive purposes protected by this section may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any violation of this section or to recover reasonable court costs and attorney fees.

In an action brought pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, if the court finds that a violation occurred, the court shall award the aggrieved party injunctive relief for the violation and shall award reasonable court costs and attorney fees.

A student shall bring an action pursuant to this section within one calendar year after the date that the violation occurred.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-062), ch. 100, p. 355, § 1, effective August 9.

23-5-145. Credit for military education and training - policy - definition.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "state institution of higher education" or "institution" has the same meaning as provided in section 23-18-102 (10); except that "state institution of higher education" or "institution" includes each local district college that is part of a local college district organized pursuant to article 71 of this title 23 and the area technical colleges, as defined in section 23-60-103.

On or before January 1, 2018, each governing board of a state institution of higher education shall adopt, make public, and implement a prior learning assessment policy for awarding academic credit for college-level learning acquired while in the military. The policy adopted by the governing board must require each campus of the institution to:

Use the American Council on Education's recommendations on the joint services transcript, among other factors, to evaluate college-level learning acquired by a student while in the military and, at the discretion of the campus, assign appropriate prior learning assessment credit;

Provide specific guidance to active duty and veteran military members in selecting a program of study and in optimizing the use of prior learning assessment credit to accelerate the student's path to degree or certificate completion in the chosen program of study; and

Beginning June 1, 2018, accept in transfer from within the institution and from other state institutions of higher education prior learning assessment credit awarded for courses with guaranteed-transfer designation, unless the Colorado commission on higher education adopts a new policy prior to June 1, 2018, concerning the transfer of prior learning assessment credit for courses with guaranteed-transfer designation that requires each campus to accept in transfer credit awarded by a state institution of higher education pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2)(a) of this section. Each campus may also accept other prior learning assessment credit toward the student's program of study if the credit meets standards established by the campus.

The state institution of higher education shall grant prior learning assessment credit free of tuition but may charge a reasonable fee for the prior learning assessment.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1004), ch. 274, p. 1510, § 2, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (4), effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2017, p. 1510.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 17-1004, see section 1 of chapter 274, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

23-5-145.5. Credit for work-related experience - plan - report - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission on higher education" or "commission" has the same meaning set forth in section 23-1-101.1 (1).

"Council" means the council created and existing pursuant to section 23-1-108.5, convened by the commission on higher education.

"Guaranteed-transfer pathways" or "GT pathways" means the statewide articulation matrix system of common course numbering for general education courses described in section 23-1-108.5 (3)(c).

"State institution of higher education" or "institution" has the same meaning set forth in section 23-1-135 (2).

"Statewide degree transfer agreement" means a statewide degree transfer agreement described in section 23-1-108 (7).

"Work-related experience" means any experience acquired within the past ten years through paid or unpaid employment, including but not limited to self-employment, an internship, a residency, a pre-apprenticeship program, or an apprenticeship program that may lead to or result in a business credential, an industry credential, a technical certificate, or a professional license.

The department of higher education, in consultation with institutions, shall conduct a study concerning awarding academic credit for prior learning opportunities within all institutions. The study must examine:

The processes by which a student can receive academic credit for any course in the undergraduate curriculum, free of tuition, through successful completion of a portfolio assessment, individual assessment, examination, or any combination thereof that is appropriate to the learning outcomes of the course;

The potential benefits to a student, including but not limited to impact on a student's overall attendance cost, whether a policy would accelerate the time to complete a postsecondary credential, and the impact on the state's goal to increase credential attainment rates; and

The costs to institutions to develop and maintain processes to grant academic credit to a student for prior learning and the ability to recover administrative costs from students requesting the prior learning assessment.

On or before September 1, 2021, the commission shall report to the education committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, the results of the study described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

On or before January 1, 2022, the council, in collaboration with the commission, shall create, adopt, and implement a plan, referred to in this section as the "plan", to award postsecondary academic credit for courses in GT pathways or a statewide degree transfer agreement for learning demonstrated from work-related experience. In creating the plan, priority may be given to work-related experience that is responsive to workforce demands and growing industries identified by the most recent Colorado talent pipeline report prepared pursuant to section 24-46.3-103 or identified in consultation with the Colorado work force development council in section 24-46.3-101.

The council, commission, or department of higher education, or any combination thereof, may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of creating, adopting, and implementing a plan pursuant to this section. The plan shall not be created, adopted, or implemented unless sufficient money is available from gifts, grants, or donations to cover the costs of creating, adopting, and implementing a plan pursuant to this section.

The plan must include:

A process for assessing and aligning work-related experience to the knowledge and competencies required for awarding postsecondary academic credit for courses in GT pathways or a statewide degree transfer agreement, which credit granted must be transferable to another institution pursuant to commission policy regarding GT pathways or a statewide degree transfer agreement; and

A process for evaluating credentials earned by a student at an area technical college pursuant to section 23-60-802 and determining how postsecondary academic credit will transfer from area technical colleges, if appropriate, to public two-year and four-year state institutions of higher education.

The council, in creating the plan, shall consult with:

Representatives of institutions, including, but not limited to, faculty members and registrars;

Representatives of organizations that represent students in Colorado;

Representatives of the Colorado work force development council;

Representatives of industries with high workforce demand and growing industries identified in the most recent Colorado talent pipeline report and organizations representing them; and

Representatives selected by the commission.

Upon completion of the plan, the council, in collaboration with the representatives described in subsection (5) of this section, shall continue to work toward expanding opportunities for awarding postsecondary academic credit for learning acquired from work-related experience not otherwise addressed in this section.

Beginning in the 2022-23 academic year, unless the plan is implemented prior to the beginning of the 2022-23 academic year, an institution shall accept in and transfer within the institution and to other institutions postsecondary academic credit awarded for work-related experience for a course that is GT pathways designated or part of a statewide degree transfer agreement.

During the second regular session of the seventy-third general assembly in 2022, the department of higher education shall report to the education committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, regarding the creation, adoption, and implementation of the plan adopted pursuant to this section.

This subsection (8) is repealed, effective July 1, 2022.

On or before March 1, 2024, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the council shall report to the education committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, regarding the continued implementation of this section. The report must include, at a minimum:

The number of students who were awarded credits and who transferred credits to or from an institution pursuant to this section;

Data regarding the age and demographics of students who were awarded credits and who transferred credits to or from an institution pursuant to this section;

The implementation challenges of this section;

The fee established and charged by institutions, if any, to administer a portfolio assessment, individual assessment, examination, or any combination thereof;

The direct costs imposed on institutions to implement this section; and

Any recommended statutory revisions to this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirement pursuant to this subsection (9) continues until the repeal of this subsection (9).

This subsection (9) is repealed, effective July 1, 2029.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1002), ch. 255, p. 1241, § 2, effective July 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1002, see section 1 of chapter 255, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

23-5-145.6. Opportunities for credential attainment - fund - report - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Apprenticeship certificate" means verification of completion of an apprenticeship program. Apprenticeship certificates are applicable to industry trades and professions.

"Colorado talent report" means the report prepared pursuant to section 24-46.3-103.

"Commission on higher education" or "commission" has the same meaning as set forth in section 23-1-101.1 (1).

"Department" means the department of higher education created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-114.

"Guaranteed-transfer pathways" or "GT pathways" means the statewide articulation matrix system of common course numbering for general education courses described in section 23-1-108.5 (3)(c).

"Industry certification" means a credential awarded by an industry-recognized third-party or industry-governing board based on an individual demonstrating by assessment that the individual has acquired the designated knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform a specific occupation or skill. Industry certifications may be time-limited dependent upon the occupation or industry.

"Nondegree credential" means a postsecondary certificate, apprenticeship certificate, professional license, or industry certification.

"Postsecondary certificate" means a credential awarded by an institution of higher education at an undergraduate level based on completion of all requirements for a program of study, including course work and exams. Postsecondary certificates are not time-limited and do not require renewal. "Postsecondary certificate" does not include a degree and does not include a credential awarded by an institution of higher education after completion of a bachelor's degree in the same pathway.

"Stackable credential pathway" means a sequence of credentials earned through various means, including through assessment of prior learning, that may be accumulated over time and move an individual along a career pathway or up a career ladder.

"State institution of higher education" or "institution" has the same meaning as set forth in section 23-1-135 (2).

"Statewide degree transfer agreement" means a statewide degree transfer agreement described in section 23-1-108 (7).

By June 15, 2023, the department, in consultation with institutions and at least one business organization or representative of industry, shall develop and implement a process that encourages institutions to identify incremental achievements on the path to degree completion and organize stackable credentials that build upon each other toward degrees and may articulate to pathways in high-demand industries. The department and institutions shall collaborate to identify how credentials may be evaluated for their component skills, competencies, and learning outcomes, and then may become stacked into a stackable credential pathway to provide increased access to employment and may result in a degree. As a part of the process, the department and institutions shall:

Evaluate the quality of nondegree credentials that are currently available that lead to in-demand living wage jobs identified in the most recent Colorado talent report and respond to critical job shortages in Colorado. The department, in collaboration with institutions, shall evaluate the quality of nondegree credentials using the framework and process created in this subsection (2) and informed by one or more quality standards frameworks developed by national organizations.

Identify where alignment currently exists along a degree pathway between nondegree and degree credentials and work-based learning and apprenticeships; and

Identify opportunities to develop where further alignment may be created between nondegree and degree credentials and work-based learning and apprenticeships; and

Articulate where the various alignments identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section may incorporate into stackable credential pathways that may lead to a degree and opportunities for credits to be transferred in order for persons to be able to attain nondegree or degree credentials that lead to in-demand or living wage jobs.

By January 1, 2024, the department, in consultation with the representatives described in section 23-5-145.5 (5), shall facilitate the creation of stackable credential pathways for at least three growing industries identified by the most recent Colorado talent report. By January 1, 2025, the department, in consultation with the representatives described in section 23-5-145.5 (5), shall facilitate the creation of stackable credential pathways for at least two additional growing industries identified by the most recent Colorado talent report. The department shall facilitate the creation of at least two stackable credential pathways for each industry. The stackable credential pathways must include:

A competency framework that articulates the knowledge, skills, learning outcomes, nondegree credentials, and degrees associated with the pathway and identifies the career and professional development opportunities associated with the pathway;

An inventory of credentials that are a part of the pathway, offered by accredited and nonaccredited providers, including training and industry credential providers, high schools, programs recognized by the career development success program pursuant to section 22-54-138, postsecondary institutions, and nonprofit organizations;

Credentials that are a part of the pathway evaluated pursuant to section 23-5-145.5 (3), including credit awarded for courses in GT pathways or a statewide degree transfer agreement; and

Credits that are awarded for other courses with a career and technical education focus in a postsecondary degree, noncredit program, or industry certification program.

The stackable credential pathways must be approved by the commission, in consultation with the Colorado work force development council.

The credentials to support the Colorado jobs cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to the fund pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section and any other money that the general assembly appropriates or transfers to the fund.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate one million dollars to the department from the workers, employers, and workforce centers cash fund created in section 24-75-231. The department shall use this appropriation for the purposes described in this section.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the department may expend money from the fund for the purposes described in this section.

On or before December 29, 2023, and on or before December 31, 2025, the department of higher education shall submit a report to the education committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, regarding the implementation of this section. The report must include data collected by institutions to measure the total number of credits, credentials, certificates, and professional licenses earned in each pathway at each institution, as practicable. The report must include the data for the state as a whole and for each institution, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender.

Nothing in this section supersedes or replaces the curriculum or program standards of a construction industry registered apprenticeship program that is registered and approved by the United States department of labor or the state apprenticeship agency.

Nothing in this section supersedes or replaces any statutory or regulatory training requirement for a professional license or credential regulated by the department of regulatory agencies.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-192), ch. 227, p. 1681, § 2, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-192, see section 1 of chapter 227, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-5-145.7. Funding for nondegree credential programs - duty - policy - appropriation - report - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Apprenticeship certificate" means verification of completion of an apprenticeship program. Apprenticeship certificates are applicable to industry trades and professions.

"Colorado talent report" means the report prepared pursuant to section 24-46.3-103.

"Commission on higher education" or "commission" has the same meaning as set forth in section 23-1-101.1 (1).

"Community and technical college" means the community and technical colleges described in section 23-60-205 or institutions of higher education that offer career and technical education programs or associate degrees.

"Department" means the department of higher education created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-114.

"Industry certification" means a credential awarded by an industry-recognized third party or industry-governing board based on an individual demonstrating by assessment that the individual has acquired the designated knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform a specific occupation or skill. Industry certifications may be time-limited dependent upon the occupation or industry.

"Local district college" has the same meaning as defined in section 23-71-102 (1).

"Nondegree credential" means a postsecondary certificate, apprenticeship certificate, professional license, or industry certification.

"Postsecondary certificate" means a credential awarded by an institution of higher education at an undergraduate level based on completion of all requirements for a program of study, including course work and exams. Postsecondary certificates are not time-limited and do not require renewal. "Postsecondary certificate" does not include a degree and does not include a credential awarded by an institution of higher education after completion of a bachelor's degree in the same pathway.

Subject to the appropriation in subsection (6) of this section, the commission shall allocate and disburse funds to community and technical colleges and local district colleges to fund student access to nondegree credential programs.

The commission shall create a policy concerning the allocation and disbursement of funds. The policy must prioritize funding nondegree credential programs that:

Are part of an industry-aligned pathway;

Are associated with industries identified in the most recent Colorado talent report;

Are stackable in alignment with section 23-5-145.6; and

Address critical job shortages in Colorado.

On or before September 1, 2023, each community and technical college or local district college that receives funding pursuant to this section shall submit a report to the department. At a minimum, the report must include data to measure the total number of credentials earned and subsequent placements in jobs that are responsive to workforce demands pursuant to the nondegree credential program. The report must include the data for the state as a whole and for each recipient, in total and disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender.

On or before January 5, 2024, the department shall submit a report to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, regarding the funding allocated and distributed pursuant to this section. At a minimum, the report must summarize the information provided to the department pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate one million eight hundred thousand dollars to the department for the purposes of this section. The department shall not use more than three percent of the appropriation to administer the requirements of this section.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-192), ch. 227, p. 1684, § 3, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-192, see section 1 of chapter 227, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-5-146. Sexual misconduct - policies - confidential resources - training - reports - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Clery act" means the federal "Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act" or "Clery Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1092(f).

"Complainant" means a person who is subject to alleged sexual misconduct under an institution's sexual misconduct policy.

"Department" means the department of higher education created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-114.

"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a state institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-18-102 (10)(b), or any accredited campus of a state institution of higher education; a participating private institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-18-102 (8); a local district college, as defined in section 23-71-102 (1)(a); and an area technical college, as defined in section 23-60-103 (1).

"Reporting party" means an individual who reports an alleged incident of sexual misconduct under an institution's sexual misconduct policy.

"Responding party" means an individual who has been accused of sexual misconduct under an institution's sexual misconduct policy.

"Title IX" means Title IX of the federal education amendments of 1972, as amended, 20 U.S.C. secs. 1681 to 1688.

"Violence against women act" means the act codified in part at 42 U.S.C. secs. 13701 to 14040.

On or before August 1, 2020, each institution of higher education shall adopt a sexual misconduct policy for enrolled students. Each institution shall periodically review and update the policy.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if there is a conflict between this section and any federal law or regulation and based on that conflict an institution of higher education is at risk of losing federal money for itself or its students, the institution shall follow federal law and shall not be liable for any violation of this section based on that action.

At a minimum, each sexual misconduct policy must include:

Definitions of forms of sexual misconduct consistent with federal and state law and policy;

Confidential and nonconfidential reporting options for sexual misconduct;

An explanation of the role of the institution in the response to:

A violation of the sexual misconduct policy; or

A report of an incident of sexual misconduct;

Procedures for investigating reports of sexual misconduct, which must:

Be fair, impartial, and prompt, and the institution must make a good-faith effort to complete an investigation or adjudicative process, excluding any appeals, within an average of sixty to ninety days, without jeopardizing the rights of a complainant or responding party. The procedure may include a process that allows for the extension of these time frames for good cause with prior written notice of the delay and the reason for the delay to the complainant and the responding party.

Include the preponderance of the evidence as the evidentiary standard when a student is the respondent, notwithstanding any other evidentiary standard in any other policy of the institution;

Outline the procedures to be followed in the investigation and adjudication process, which must specify that all questions go through the official individual or individuals conducting or participating in the investigation process;

Provide the complainant and the responding party with the same opportunities to have an advisor or other person present during any part of the proceeding; except that the advisor or other person is not allowed to speak on behalf of the complainant or responding party during the course of the proceedings;

Provide regular written updates on the status of the investigation or proceeding to the complainant and responding party throughout the process until conclusion; and

Provide for concurrent notification of the outcome of the investigation or proceeding to the complainant and the responding party;

Prohibitions on:

The consideration of prior, irrelevant sexual conduct, except relating to a prior relationship or history between the parties if relevant to some material issue in the process; and

Any action that would be retaliatory under Title IX;

Protection from disciplinary action against a complainant, reporting party, or witness for his or her participation in the reporting or investigation and from policy violations related to the incident, such as, at a minimum, personal consumption of alcohol or drugs; and

That all provisions of the sexual misconduct policy, including any appeal process that may be provided, be applied equally to both the complainant and the responding party.

Commencing on or before August 1, 2020, each institution shall provide information to students on how to receive support regarding sexual misconduct. The institution may designate faculty or staff members to fill this role; except that the institution's Title IX coordinator shall not be such an individual. An institution may also designate an outside entity or service to serve this purpose. If an institution uses an outside entity or service, it shall make its sexual misconduct policy available to the entity or service. An institution that enrolls fewer than one thousand students may partner with another institution in the region or within the state to provide services pursuant to this subsection (4).

If an individual described in subsection (4)(a) of this section meets the requirements of section 13-90-107 (1)(k)(II) or section 12-245-220, the individual has the protections for confidentiality or privileges established pursuant to those sections.

Commencing on or before August 1, 2020, each institution of higher education shall promote:

Awareness and prevention of sexual misconduct; and

The institution's sexual misconduct policy.

Each institution shall promote the information described in subsection (5)(a) of this section by:

Prominently displaying on its website:

The institution's sexual misconduct policy; and

The telephone number and website for an institutional, local, state, or national twenty-four-hour hotline that provides information on sexual misconduct; and

Annually distributing through electronic or other means of communication the institution's sexual misconduct policy.

Commencing on or before August 1, 2020, each institution of higher education shall offer training:

(I) To promote awareness and prevention of sexual misconduct; and

(II) On the institution's sexual misconduct policy.

The training must be offered annually to all incoming students and newly employed faculty and staff and, when applicable, to all students, faculty, and staff if the sexual misconduct policy is substantially updated. Any individual designated as responsible for investigating or adjudicating complaints under the sexual misconduct policy must be trained on the policy in effect at the time of the investigation or adjudication.

The training required by this subsection (6) may include but is not limited to:

How to promote awareness and prevention of sexual misconduct;

An explanation of the institution's sexual misconduct policy;

An explanation of relevant state and federal laws concerning sexual misconduct;

An explanation of types of conduct that would constitute a violation of the institution's sexual misconduct policy;

The role of the institution in ensuring a coordinated response to an allegation of sexual misconduct;

The definition of "consent" in the context of sexual activity;

Options for bystander intervention;

Options for involving law enforcement in responding to sexual misconduct;

The importance of treating and how to treat others with dignity and respect; and

The effects of trauma on reporting parties or complainants who have experienced sexual misconduct that may include:

Information on working with and interviewing persons who have experienced sexual misconduct;

Ways to communicate sensitively and compassionately with a reporting party or complainant; and

Information regarding how sexual misconduct may impact students with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

On or before October 1, 2020, each institution of higher education shall provide to the department, to be posted on the department's website:

(I) A copy of the institution's sexual misconduct policy;

(II) A statement as to how the institution is providing information to students on how to receive support regarding sexual misconduct as required by subsection (4) of this section and how it is promoting the information required by subsection (5) of this section; and

(III) A description of the sexual misconduct training provided by the institution as required by subsection (6) of this section.

On or before October 1, 2021, and on or before each January 1 thereafter, each institution of higher education shall provide to the department, to be posted on the department's website:

A copy of any updated institutional sexual misconduct policy adopted during the previous calendar year;

A statement as to any changes in the manner in which the institution provides or promotes the information required by subsection (4) or (5) of this section; and

A description of the sexual misconduct training provided by the institution as required by subsection (6) of this section.

Beginning in 2020, and every year thereafter, the department shall include as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203 information concerning the reports submitted by institutions pursuant to subsection (7)(a) of this section.

Commencing on or before August 1, 2020, subject to available appropriations, the department shall host biennial summits on sexual misconduct on institution campuses for stakeholders, advocates, students, faculty, and other interested persons to facilitate communication, share information, and hear from experts, and other efforts to promote awareness and prevention of sexual misconduct on Colorado's institution campuses.

Prior to each biennial summit, the department shall convene a planning committee composed of:

A representative of a public four-year institution, appointed by the governing boards of public four-year institutions;

A representative of a public two-year college, appointed by the governing boards of public two-year colleges;

A representative of a public rural college, as defined by the department, appointed by the governing boards of public rural colleges;

A representative of a public area technical college, appointed by the governing boards of public area technical colleges;

A representative of a private four-year institution, appointed by the governing boards of the private four-year institutions;

Two students, one from a public four-year institution and one from a public two-year college, appointed by a statewide organization of public student governments;

A representative of a campus-based organization that represents victims of sexual misconduct from an institution not otherwise represented on the committee, appointed by the executive director of the department;

A representative of a statewide community-based advocacy organization that represents victims of sexual misconduct, appointed by the executive director of the department; and

A victim of sexual misconduct at an institution, appointed jointly by the representatives appointed pursuant to subsections (9)(b)(VII) and (9)(b)(VIII) of this section.

The planning committee may collaborate with other interested parties, including community partners, to develop the most effective event to facilitate the purposes of the summit as described in subsection (9)(a) of this section.

On or before January 15 of the year following the summit, the planning committee shall submit a report to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, including a summary of the events, attendees, outcomes, and recommendations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the requirement for the report in subsection (9)(d)(I) of this section continues indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-007), ch. 401, p. 3549, § 1, effective May 31.